District of Columbia statutes.
8-2101.01

Establishment of Bureau of Rodent Control.

(a)

There is established within the Department of Health a Bureau of Rodent Control (“Bureau”).

(b)

The Bureau shall be responsible for the control and elimination of rodents in the District that serve as vectors for disease, including but not limited to:

(1)

The treatment and baiting of public spaces for rodents;

(2)

The conducting of surveys of locations; and

(3)

The coordination of public outreach, education and enforcement efforts relating to cleanliness and rodent control.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 902, 47 DCR 6308
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to DC Law 6-100, the “Litter Control Administration Act of 1985;” DC Law 6-42, the “Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs Civil Infractions Act of 1985;” DC Law 5-165, the “DC Air Pollution Control Act of 1984;” DC Law 13-172, the “Rodent Control Act of 2000;” and DC Law 6-126, the “Construction Codes Approval and Amendments Act of 1986”, see Mayor’s Order 2002-5, February 1, 2002 ( 49 DCR 911).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 902 to 908 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
For temporary (90-day) addition of §§ 6-1051.1 to 6-1051.7 1981 Ed., see §§ 902 to 908 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).